Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1044
Attachment of lands in another county; writ and certificate; recording constitutes notice.

It shall be the duty of the register of deeds of the county, when the copy of the order of attachment has been filed as provided in section 25-1043, to record the same in the miscellaneous record, together with the certificate of the officers heretofore mentioned, and such copy of said orders of attachment and certificates so filed and recorded shall be sufficient notice to subsequent purchasers of the land so attached.

G.S.1873, c. 57, § 2, p. 714;

R.S.1913, § 7773;

C.S.1922, § 8717;

C.S.1929, § 20-1044;

R.S.1943, § 25-1044.